Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.020

County roads—County legislative authority as agent of state—Standards.

All of the county roads in each of the several counties shall be established, laid out, constructed, altered, repaired, improved, and maintained by the legislative authority of the respective counties as agents of the state, or by private individuals or corporations who are allowed to perform such work under an agreement with the county legislative authority. Such work shall be done in accordance with adopted county standards under the supervision and direction of the county engineer.

[ 1982 c 145 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.75.020. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 1; 1937 c 187 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-2.]